Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.650

Drug control assistance unit—Employment of necessary personnel.

The chief of the Washington state patrol may employ such criminalists, chemists, clerical and other personnel as are necessary for the conduct of the affairs of the drug control assistance unit.

[ 1970 ex.s. c 63 s 6.]